Massachusetts, session 194th, H2074.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “apparel,” in line 88 the
following words:-
"Payroll card account", a prepaid account that is directly or indirectly established through
an employer to which transfers of the employee's wages, salary or other compensation are made,
and which carries the consumer protections that apply to payroll card accounts under the
Electronic Fund Transfer Act 15 U.S.C. § 1693 et seq., and Regulation E, 29 C.F.R. Part 1005,
including the compulsory use provision, as may be amended.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 148 of chapter 149 of is hereby amended in line 107 by inserting
after the word “reasonable” the following words:- Any employer paying wages by payroll card
account shall provide the employee with the ability to make at least one withdrawal from the
payroll card account in each pay period, but not more frequently than once per week, without
charge for any amount up to and including the full amount of the employee's net wages for the
pay period. Any fees associated with usage of the card after the card’s initial transaction shall be
disclosed in advance to the employee, except that the employer is not responsible for disclosing
third party fees that are not within control of the employer. Employees who receive wages by
credit to a payroll card account must be provided with a means of checking their payroll card
account balances, either, through an automated telephone system, or online through the use of
the Internet, without cost, irrespective of the number of inquiries made.
of 2